Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.160.040

Process development.

(1) Each institution of higher education shall develop a process to determine whether or not there is a relationship between an applicant's criminal history and a specific academic program or campus residency to justify denial of admission or restrict access to campus residency.

(2) The process developed under this section shall be set forth in writing and shall include consideration of:

(a) The age of the applicant at the time any aspect of the applicant's criminal history occurred;

(b) The time that has elapsed since any aspect of the applicant's criminal history occurred;

(c) The nature of the criminal history, including but not limited to whether the applicant was convicted of a "serious violent offense" or a "sex offense" as those terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(d) Evidence of rehabilitation or good conduct produced by the applicant.

[ 2018 c 83 s 4.]